Utah statutes.
53-7-303.   Exclusions from part.

This part does not apply to any of the following:

(1)  the production, refining, or manufacture of LPG;

(2)  the storage, sale, or transportation of LPG by pipeline or railroad tank car by a pipeline company, producer, refiner, or manufacturer;

(3)  equipment used by a pipeline company, producer, refiner, or manufacturer in a producing, refining, or manufacturing process or in the storage, sale, or transportation by pipeline or railroad tank car;

(4)  any deliveries of LPG to another person at the place of production, refining, or manufacturing;

(5)  underground storage facilities other than LPG containers designed for underground use;

(6)  refineries, pipeline terminals, or natural gas processing plants.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

